District of Columbia statutes.
42-3212

Consolidation of actions for arrears of rent and possession.

If actions be brought separately for arrears of rent and for the possession, they may be afterwards consolidated and 1 judgment rendered in them for the possession and also for the rent.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1383, ch. 854, § 1227
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 575, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 157(g)

Cross References

Possessory actions, see § 16-1501 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1412.
1973 Ed., § 45-912.